test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-57taplwma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `taplõma: # Verb (57) `taplõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     taplõma+V+Inf/mA: taplõma
     taplõma+V+Inf: tapõldaq
     taplõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: tapõlnuq
     taplõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [tapõld, tapõldu]

     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taplõ
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [taplõt, taplõdõq]
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taplõs
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: taplõmiq
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: taplõtiq
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: taplõsõq
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: taplõ
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tapli
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [taplit, tapliq, taplidõq]
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tapõlʼ
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: taplimiq
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: taplitiq
     taplõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tapliq, taplivaq]

     taplõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tapõlda
     taplõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tapõldas

     taplõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: taplõv

     taplõma+V+Jus: tapõlguq
